Missouri, session 2026, SB1437.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 106.220, 106.230, 106.250, 106.270,
558.011, and 558.016, RSMo, are repealed and twelve new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 56.063,
106.220, 106.230, 106.250, 106.270, 106.301, 106.305, 478.2000,
546.395, 546.950, 558.011, and 558.016, to read as follows:
56.063. It shall be the official duty of a prosecuting
attorney to faithfully comply with the provisions of
sections 546.950, 557.036, and 558.016, with respect to the
execution and enforcement of the criminal laws of this
state. A prosecuting attorney who has failed, personally,
to devote his or her time to the performance of the
requirements therein, or has been guilty of any willful,
corrupt, or fraudulent violations of neglect of the official
duties therein, or has knowingly or willfully failed or
refused to comply with the provisions therein shall be
subject to removal pursuant to the applicable provisions of
chapter 106.
106.220. Any person elected or appointed to any
county, city, town or township office in this state, except
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1437 2
such officers as may be subject to removal by impeachment,
who shall fail personally to devote his or her time to the
performance of the duties of such office, or who shall be
guilty of any willful or fraudulent violation or neglect of
any official duty, or who shall knowingly or willfully fail
or refuse to do or perform any official act or duty which by
law it is his or her duty to do or perform with respect to
the execution or enforcement of the criminal laws of the
state, shall thereby forfeit his or her office, and may be
removed therefrom in the manner provided in sections 106.230
to [106.290] 106.301.
106.230. When any person has knowledge that any
official mentioned in section 106.220 has failed,
personally, to devote his or her time to the performance of
the duties of such office, or has been guilty of any
willful, corrupt or fraudulent violations or neglect of any
official duty, or has knowingly or willfully failed or
refused to perform any official act or duty which by law it
was his or her duty to do or perform with respect to the
execution or enforcement of the criminal laws of this state,
with the exception of violations of section 106.301, which
shall be responded to as provided therein, he or she may
make his or her affidavit before any person authorized to
administer oaths, setting forth the facts constituting such
offense and file the same with the clerk of the court having
jurisdiction of the offense, for the use of the prosecuting
attorney or deposit it with the prosecuting attorney,
furnishing also the names of witnesses who have knowledge of
the facts constituting such offense; and it shall be the
duty of the prosecuting attorney, if, in his or her opinion,
the facts stated in said affidavit justify the prosecution
of the official charged, to file a complaint in the circuit

SB 1437 3
court as soon as practicable upon such affidavit, setting
forth in plain and concise language the charge against such
official, or the prosecuting attorney may file such
complaint against such official upon his or her official
oath and upon his or her own affidavit.
106.250. 1. When an affidavit has been filed with the
clerk of the circuit court of any county in this state, as
provided in sections 106.230 and 106.240, the governor may,
in his or her discretion, direct the attorney general to
assist in the prosecution against said officer; and in case
of the refusal of the prosecuting attorney or special
prosecutor, after the filing of the affidavit provided for
in sections 106.230 and 106.240, to file a complaint, the
attorney general shall have authority to file a complaint
against the official complained of.
2. In the case of an affidavit filed with the attorney
general, as provided for in section 106.301, the attorney
general shall have the power and authority to file a
complaint against the official complained of, or the
attorney general may file such complaint against such
official upon his or her official oath and upon his or her
own affidavit.
106.270. 1. If any official against whom a proceeding
has been filed, as provided for in sections 106.220 to
[106.290] 106.301, shall be found guilty of failing
personally to devote his or her time to the performance of
the duties of such office, or of any willful, corrupt or
fraudulent violation or neglect of official duty, or of
knowingly or willfully failing or refusing to do or perform
any official act or duty which by law it is made his or her
duty to do or perform with respect to the execution or
enforcement of the criminal laws of the state, the court

SB 1437 4
shall render judgment removing him or her from such office,
and he or she shall not be elected or appointed to fill the
vacancy thereby created, but the same shall be filled as
provided by law for filling vacancies in other cases. All
actions and proceedings under sections 106.220 to [106.290]
106.301 shall be in the nature of civil actions, and tried
as such.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize the removal or discharge of any chief, as that
term is defined in section 106.273.
106.301. 1. Failure by a prosecuting attorney to
charge and faithfully plead and prove defendants eligible
for an enhancement under sections 557.036 and 558.016 or
failure to abide by the plea restrictions provided under
section 546.950 shall be cause for immediate removal from
office.
2. When any person has knowledge that any prosecuting
attorney has knowingly or willfully failed or refused to
perform or abide by a requirement under sections 546.950 or
557.036 which by law it was his or her duty to do or perform
with respect to the execution or enforcement of the criminal
laws of this state, he or she may make his affidavit before
any person authorized to administer oaths, setting forth the
facts constituting such offense and deposit it with the
attorney general, and it shall be the duty of the attorney
general, if, in his or her opinion, the facts stated in said
affidavit justify the prosecution of the official charged,
to file a complaint in the court of his or her choosing with
appropriate jurisdiction as soon as practicable upon such
affidavit, but no later than six months following receipt of
the affidavit, setting forth in plain and concise language
the charge against such official.

SB 1437 5
3. In all prosecutions under this section, the
defendant shall, upon conviction, after judgement of removal
is entered, be entitled to an appeal to the Missouri supreme
court, and said cause shall have precedence in said court on
such appeal, and the supreme court shall hear such appeal as
soon as possible, except in cases filed originally in the
Missouri supreme court following the discretion of the
attorney general provided for under subsection 2 of this
section, in which case the defendant shall have no right to
appeal. Pending such appeal, as applicable, such officer
shall be suspended from office, and the governor shall
appoint a resident of the county, qualified in law, who
shall act as such special officer pending the appeal; and if
the decision on the appeal in the supreme court shall be in
favor of the defendant, he or she shall be entitled to pay
for the time for which he or she was removed. The person
acting as such officer during such appeal shall be entitled
to the same compensation of a duly elected officer. The
costs herein provided for shall be taxed against and paid
for by the county in which the officer held office.
4. A decision by the court hearing the complaint need
only establish facts determining whether, as applicable:
(1) The criminal defendant in the case giving rise to
the complaint herein was eligible for sentencing enhancement
under section 558.016; and
(2) The prosecuting attorney failed to plead and prove
the eligible criminal defendant with the sentencing
enhancement pursuant to section 557.036; or
(3) The prosecuting attorney failed to abide by the
requirements of section 546.950.
5. If a prosecuting attorney against whom a proceeding
has been filed, as provided for in this section, shall be

SB 1437 6
found guilty of the charge therein, said court shall render
judgment removing him or her from such office, and he or she
shall not be elected or appointed to fill the vacancy
thereby created, nor be eligible to serve such office in any
jurisdiction of this state, but the vacancy shall be filled
as provided by law for filling vacancies in other cases.
All actions and proceedings under this section shall be in
the nature of civil actions, and tried as such.
6. The sentencing event giving rise to the removal
under this section shall not be subject to review, appeal,
retrial, or any other form of reconsideration or amendment
on the sole basis of the rendered judgment of guilt against
the prosecuting attorney.
7. A suit initiated under this section shall be
governed by the provisions set forth under section 106.305,
and each party shall be responsible for costs incurred as a
result of the filing.
106.305. 1. The legislature finds that an allegation
of dereliction of duty under section 106.301 by a
prosecuting attorney represents a matter of urgent public
concern that implicates the integrity of the proper
functioning of government. Accordingly, actions initiated
under section 106.301 shall be afforded the highest priority
and shall be heard and resolved at the earliest practicable
date.
2. The attorney general may file a complaint pursuant
to the requirements of section 106.301 in a court of his or
her choosing with appropriate jurisdiction, including, but
not necessarily limited to, the circuit court where the
violation occurred or the Missouri supreme court.
3. (1) Upon the filing of a complaint in a court of
appropriate jurisdiction, or an appeal thereof, the clerk of

SB 1437 7
the court shall immediately docket the action for expedited
consideration and said cause shall have precedence in said
court.
(2) Such court shall, within twenty calendar days of
the action, hold a mandatory conference to establish a
binding timeline for all pretrial matters.
(3) A trial on the merits shall be set for a date not
more than one-hundred-twenty calendar days from the date the
petition was filed. No continuance of the trial date shall
be granted except upon a showing of extraordinary and
unforeseen circumstances that are not attributable to the
conduct of either party.
4. (1) All discovery shall be completed no later than
sixty days from the filing of the petition. Such court
shall limit the scope and methods of discovery to the
matters necessary to establish prima facie the facts alleged.
(2) Any motion that would dispose of the action prior
to a trial on the merits, including a motion to dismiss or a
motion for summary judgment, shall be filed no later than
thirty days from the filing of the action. Such motions
shall be ruled upon within ten business days of the date of
filing. The filing of such a motion shall not operate to
stay the discovery deadlines or trial schedule established.
5. An appeal, if applicable, may be filed no later
than thirty days following the final judgment of such court.
478.2000. 1. Failure by a circuit judge to faithfully
sentence eligible defendants with an enhancement pursuant to
section 558.016 or failure to abide by the plea restrictions
provided under section 546.950 shall constitute willful
neglect of duty and such circuit judge shall forfeit his or
her right to continue holding such office.

SB 1437 8
2. Such forfeiture shall be sufficient cause for a quo
warranto proceeding initiated by the attorney general in a
court of his or her choosing with appropriate jurisdiction,
as provided by Article V, Section 4 of the Constitution of
Missouri, chapter 531, or any other authority provided to
the office.
3. (1) Upon the filing of a proceeding in a court of
appropriate jurisdiction, or an appeal thereof, the clerk of
the court shall immediately docket the action for expedited
consideration and said cause shall have precedence in said
court.
(2) Such court shall, within twenty calendar days of
the action, hold a mandatory conference to establish a
binding timeline for all pretrial matters.
(3) A trial on the merits shall be set for a date not
more than one-hundred-twenty calendar days from the date the
petition was filed. No continuance of the trial date shall
be granted except upon a showing of extraordinary and
unforeseen circumstances that are not attributable to the
conduct of either party.
4. (1) All discovery shall be completed no later than
sixty days from the filing of the petition. Such court
shall limit the scope and methods of discovery to the
matters necessary to establish prima facie the facts alleged.
(2) Any motion that would dispose of the action prior
to a trial on the merits, including a motion to dismiss or a
motion for summary judgment, must be filed no later than
thirty days from the filing of the action. Such motions
shall be ruled upon within ten business days of the date of
filing. The filing of such a motion shall not operate to
stay the discovery deadlines or trial schedule established.

SB 1437 9
5. An appeal, if applicable, may be filed no later
than thirty days following the final judgment of such court.
546.395. In such cases of a person found guilty of an
offense and sentenced to an extended term of imprisonment
pursuant to section 558.016, the present offense giving rise
to the term of imprisonment shall be recorded as an offense
of the class of the extended sentence. All records
heretofore recording the present offense shall be amended to
reflect the enhanced class of offense.
546.950. 1. Plea bargaining in any case in which the
original charging document includes any offense listed under
subsection 5 of this section, or in any case in which the
defendant is eligible for an enhancement pursuant to section
558.016, is prohibited, except in instances where there is
insufficient evidence to prove the state's case.
2. Any exercise of the exception provided in
subsection 1 of this section shall be accompanied by a
written statement on the record to the court by the
prosecuting attorney detailing the good faith justification
that the prosecution would not be able to establish a prima
facie case. If the original charging document was filed by
a law enforcement officer, such law enforcement officer
shall be given sufficient notice of the intention to
exercise the exception provided in subsection 1 of this
section and the opportunity to present to the presiding
judge evidence or reasoning relating to the original
charging document prior to the presiding judge's decision on
the motion.
3. A presiding judge shall not accept any plea bargain
that violates subsection 1 of this section and any plea
bargain that is insufficiently justified pursuant to
subsection 2 of this section.

SB 1437 10
4. As used in this section, "plea bargaining" or "plea
bargain" means any bargaining, negotiation, or discussion
between a criminal defendant, or their counsel, and a
prosecuting attorney or presiding judge, whereby the
defendant agrees to plead in the affirmative, in any form or
capacity, in exchange for any promises, commitments,
concessions, assurances, or consideration by the prosecuting
attorney or presiding judge relating to any charge against
the defendant or to the sentencing of the defendant in any
form, such that the agreement would reduce, dismiss, delay,
or in any way lessen the charges against the defendant or
the term of incarceration of the defendant.
5. The following offenses, to include attempts to
commit such offenses, are ineligible for plea agreement:
(1) First degree murder, as defined in section 565.020;
(2) Rape in the first degree, as defined in section
566.030;
(3) Rape in the second degree, as defined in section
566.031;
(4) Statutory rape and attempt to commit, first
degree, as defined in section 566.032;
(5) Statutory rape in the second degree, as defined in
section 566.034;
(6) Domestic assault in the first degree, as defined
in section 565.072;
(7) Domestic assault in the second degree, as defined
in section 565.073;
(8) Domestic assault in the third degree, as defined
in section 565.074;
(9) Domestic assault in the fourth degree, as defined
in section 565.076;

SB 1437 11
(10) Kidnapping in the first degree, as defined in
section 565.110;
(11) Kidnapping in the second degree, as defined in
section 565.120;
(12) Kidnapping in the third degree, as defined in
section 565.130;
(13) Child kidnapping, as defined in section 565.115;
(14) Parental kidnapping, as defined in section
565.153;
(15) Vehicle hijacking, as defined in section 570.027;
(16) Robbery in the first degree, as defined in
section 570.023;
(17) Robbery in the second degree, as defined in
section 570.025;
(18) Burglary in the first degree, as defined in
section 569.160;
(19) Burglary in the second degree, as defined in
section 569.170;
(20) Armed criminal action, as defined in section
571.015;
(21) Unlawful possession of a firearm, as defined in
section 571.070;
(22) Arson in the first degree, as defined in section
569.040;
(23) Arson in the second degree, as defined in section
569.050;
(24) Arson in the third degree, as defined in section
569.053;
(25) The delivery of a controlled substance, as
defined in section 579.020 where the offense is classified
as a class B felony and the person has one or more prior
convictions for the delivery of a controlled substance

SB 1437 12
classified as a class C felony, as defined in 579.020, prior
to or at the time of committing the offense;
(26) Manufacture of a controlled substance, as defined
in section 579.055 where the offense is classified as a
class B felony and the person has one or more prior
convictions for the manufacture of a controlled substance
classified as a class C felony, as defined in section
579.055, prior to or at the time of committing the offense.
558.011. 1. The authorized terms of imprisonment,
including both prison and conditional release terms, are:
(1) For a class A felony, a term of years not less
than [ten] fifteen years and not to exceed [thirty years]
forty years, or life imprisonment;
(2) For a class B felony, a term of years not less
than [five] ten years and not to exceed [fifteen] twenty
years;
(3) For a class C felony, a term of years not less
than [three] five years and not to exceed [ten] fifteen
years;
(4) For a class D felony, a term of years not less
than three years and not to exceed [seven] ten years;
(5) For a class E felony, a term of years not less
than two years and not to exceed [four] five years;
(6) For a class A misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
one year;
(7) For a class B misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
six months;
(8) For a class C misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
fifteen days.
2. [In cases of class D and E felonies, the court
shall have discretion to imprison for a special term not to
exceed one year in the county jail or other authorized penal

SB 1437 13
institution, and the place of confinement shall be fixed by
the court. If the court imposes a sentence of imprisonment
for a term longer than one year upon a person convicted of a
class D or E felony, it shall commit the person to the
custody of the department of corrections.
3.] (1) When a regular sentence of imprisonment for a
felony is imposed, the court shall commit the person to the
custody of the department of corrections for the term
imposed under section 557.036, or until released under
procedures established elsewhere by law.
(2) A sentence of imprisonment for a misdemeanor shall
be for a definite term and the court shall commit the person
to the county jail or other authorized penal institution for
the term of his or her sentence or until released under
procedure established elsewhere by law.
[4.] 3. (1) Except as otherwise provided, a sentence
of imprisonment for a term of years for felonies other than
dangerous felonies as defined in section 556.061, and other
than sentences of imprisonment which involve the
individual's fourth or subsequent remand to the department
of corrections shall consist of a prison term and a
conditional release term. The conditional release term of
any term imposed under section 557.036 shall be:
(a) One-third for terms of nine years or less;
(b) Three years for terms between nine and fifteen
years;
(c) Five years for terms more than fifteen years; and
the prison term shall be the remainder of such term. The
prison term may be extended by the parole board pursuant to
subsection 5 of this section.
(2) "Conditional release" means the conditional
discharge of an offender by the parole board, subject to

SB 1437 14
conditions of release that the parole board deems reasonable
to assist the offender to lead a law-abiding life, and
subject to the supervision under the division of probation
and parole. The conditions of release shall include
avoidance by the offender of any other offense, federal or
state, and other conditions that the parole board in its
discretion deems reasonably necessary to assist the releasee
in avoiding further violation of the law.
[5.] 4. The date of conditional release from the prison
term may be extended up to a maximum of the entire sentence
of imprisonment by the parole board. The director of any
division of the department of corrections except the
division of probation and parole may file with the parole
board a petition to extend the conditional release date when
an offender fails to follow the rules and regulations of the
division or commits an act in violation of such rules.
Within ten working days of receipt of the petition to extend
the conditional release date, the parole board shall convene
a hearing on the petition. The offender shall be present
and may call witnesses in his or her behalf and cross-
examine witnesses appearing against the offender. The
hearing shall be conducted as provided in section 217.670.
If the violation occurs in close proximity to the
conditional release date, the conditional release may be
held for a maximum of fifteen working days to permit
necessary time for the division director to file a petition
for an extension with the parole board and for the parole
board to conduct a hearing, provided some affirmative
manifestation of an intent to extend the conditional release
has occurred prior to the conditional release date. If at
the end of a fifteen-working-day period a parole board
decision has not been reached, the offender shall be

SB 1437 15
released conditionally. The decision of the parole board
shall be final.
558.016. 1. [The court may sentence a person who has
been found guilty of an offense to a term of imprisonment as
authorized by section 558.011 or to a term of imprisonment
authorized by a statute governing the offense if it finds
the defendant is a prior offender or a persistent
misdemeanor offender. The court may sentence a person to an
extended term of imprisonment if:
(1) The defendant is a persistent offender or a
dangerous offender, and the person is sentenced under
subsection 7 of this section;
(2) The statute under which the person was found
guilty contains a sentencing enhancement provision that is
based on a prior finding of guilt or a finding of prior
criminal conduct and the person is sentenced according to
the statute; or
(3) A more specific sentencing enhancement provision
applies that is based on a prior finding of guilt or a
finding of prior criminal conduct] The court shall sentence
a person who has been found guilty of an offense to a term
of imprisonment pursuant to this section if it finds the
defendant is eligible as provided in this section, except in
such cases where a more specific sentencing enhancement
provision applies that provides for a term of imprisonment
that exceeds the term of imprisonment applied in this
section, in which instance only subsection 8 of this section
shall apply.
2. [A "prior offender" is one who has been found
guilty of one felony] The court shall sentence a person, who
has been found to be a prior felony offender, and is found

SB 1437 16
guilty of a class A felony, to the maximum term of
imprisonment for that class that is not life imprisonment.
3. [A "persistent offender" is one who has been found
guilty of two or more felonies committed at different times,
or one who has been previously found guilty of a dangerous
felony as defined in subdivision (19) of section 556.061]
The court shall sentence a person, who has been found to be
a persistent felony offender, and is found guilty of a class
A felony, to life imprisonment.
4. [A "dangerous offender" is one who:] The court
shall sentence a person, who has been found to be a prior
felony offender, and is found guilty of a class B, C, D, or
E felony, to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for
the class that is one class higher than the offense for
which the person is found guilty, except life imprisonment.
[(1) Is being sentenced for a felony during the
commission of which he knowingly murdered or endangered or
threatened the life of another person or knowingly inflicted
or attempted or threatened to inflict serious physical
injury on another person; and
(2) Has been found guilty of a class A or B felony or
a dangerous felony.]
5. [A "persistent misdemeanor offender" is one who has
been found guilty of two or more offenses, committed at
different times that are classified as A or B misdemeanors
under the laws of this state] The court shall sentence a
person, who has been found to be a persistent felony
offender, and is found guilty of a class B, C, D, or E
felony, to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for
the class that is two classes higher than the offense for
which the person is found guilty, including life
imprisonment.

SB 1437 17
6. [The findings of guilt shall be prior to the date
of commission of the present offense] (1) Except as
provided by subdivision (2) of this subsection, the court
shall sentence a person, who has been found to be a
persistent misdemeanor offender, and is found guilty of a
class A, B, or C misdemeanor, to the maximum term of
imprisonment for a class E felony.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this
subsection, if such person, who has been found to be both a
persistent misdemeanor offender and a prior felony offender,
or a persistent felony offender, is found guilty of a class
A or B misdemeanor, the application of subsection 4 of this
section shall compound, in that the class E felony otherwise
imposed be the maximum authorized term of imprisonment of a
class D felony.
7. [The court shall sentence a person, who has been
found to be a persistent offender or a dangerous offender,
and is found guilty of a class B, C, D, or E felony to the
authorized term of imprisonment for the offense that is one
class higher than the offense for which the person is found
guilty] As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Guilty", in the context of determining applicable
prior offenses and the eligibility of the present offense,
includes any affirmative disposition of the charge for any
reason, including by guilty plea, trial resulting in a
finding of guilty, deferred adjudication, plea of nolo
contendere, or other form of affirmative disposition, such
as participation in a pretrial diversion program, applicable
as the context demands;
(2) "Persistent felony offender", an individual who
has been found guilty of two felonies of any class or one
felony of a class B or above;

SB 1437 18
(3) "Persistent misdemeanor offender", an individual
who has been found guilty of three misdemeanors.
8. The findings of guilt for prior offenses shall be
prior to the date of conviction of the present offense.
9. The use of a prior offense or prior offenses for
enhancement under this section shall not preclude the
100 subsequent use of such offenses for enhancement purposes,
101 and such present offense giving rise to the enhanced
102 sentence shall be recorded as an offense of the class of the
103 enhanced sentence pursuant to section 546.395 and shall
104 constitute an eligible offense in subsequent applications of
105 this section.
106 10. A term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this
107 section shall not be suspended, waived, nor reduced by any
108 other means, including by the parole board, nor shall such
109 sentence be served in a community or nonsecure setting. In
110 no event shall a defendant serve a term of imprisonment less
111 than the maximum term of imprisonment allowable under law
112 for a felony of the respective class.
Section B. If any provision of section A of this act
or the application thereof to anyone or to any circumstance
is held invalid, the remainder of those sections and the
application of such provisions to others or other
circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
Section C. Because of the need to ensure the safety of
all Missourians, section A of this act is deemed necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public health,
welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared to be an
emergency act within the meaning of the constitution, and
section A of this act shall be in full force and effect upon
its passage and approval.
✓